Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 368.706 is amended to read:
368.706. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 294.060 and 368.705, moneys  described in ORS 294.060 (1) that
are received by a county listed in  subsection (2) of this section and deposited into that county’s road
fund may be expended for patrolling within the county by the county’s law enforcement officials.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to:
(a) Coos County;
(b) Curry County;
(c) Douglas County;
(d) Grant County;
[(d)] (e) Josephine County;
[(e)] (f) Klamath County;
[(f)] (g) Lane County; and
[(g)] (h) Linn County.
(3) Moneys in  a county’s road fund and expended for patrolling under subsection (1) of this
section may be used solely for direct costs and indirect costs associated with patrolling.
(4) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Direct costs” means costs that can, with a high degree  of accuracy, be identified spe-
cifically with or directly assigned to a particular award,  project, program, service or other organ-
izational activity.
(B) “Direct  costs” includes, but is not limited to, salaries, travel, equipment and supplies directly
related to patrolling by the county’s law enforcement officials.
(b)(A) “Indirect costs” means costs  incurred for common or joint objectives that are not direct
costs.
(B) “Indirect  costs” includes, but is not limited to, the costs of operating and maintaining facil-
ities, depreciation, administrative expenses and dispatch.
(c) “Patrolling” means the activities of  a county law enforcement official that are in response
to calls for service or initiated by the county law enforcement official.
Enrolled House Bill 3328 (HB 3328-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3328 (HB 3328-A) Page 2